Hawaii statutes.
[§11-362] Contributions limited from
nonresident persons. (a) Contributions from all persons who are not
residents of the State at the time the contributions are made shall not exceed thirty
per cent of the total contributions received by a candidate or candidate
committee for each election period.

(b) This section shall not be applicable to
contributions from the candidate's immediate family. [L 2010, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next